Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,298
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Human Trafficking Victims Civil Remedy Act:

(1) Human trafficking means labor trafficking, labor trafficking of a minor, sex trafficking, or sex trafficking of a minor, as those terms are defined in section 28-830; and

(2) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830.

Laws 2015, LB294, § 2.